Connecticut, session 2026, HB05516.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) As used in this section and
section 2 of this act:
(1) "Gender-affirming health care services" means all medical care
relating to the treatment of (A) gender dysphoria, as set forth in the most
recent edition of the American Psychiatric Association's "Diagnostic and
Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders", and (B) gender incongruence,
as defined in the most recent revision of the "International Statistical
Classification of Diseases and Related Health Problems";
(2) "Health care entity" means an entity that supervises, controls,
grants privileges to, directs the practice of or directly, or indirectly,
restricts the practice of a health care provider;
(3) "Health care provider" means a person who (A) provides health
care services, (B) is licensed, certified or registered pursuant to title 20
of the general statutes, and (C) is employed by or acting on behalf of a
health care entity;
(4) "Medically accurate and appropriate information and counseling"
means information and counseling that is (A) supported by the weight
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5516
of current scientific evidence, (B) derived from research using accepted
scientific methods, (C) consistent with generally recognized scientific
theory, (D) published in peer-reviewed journals, as appropriate, and (E)
recognized as accurate, complete, objective and in accordance with the
accepted standard of care by professional organizations and agencies
with expertise in the relevant field; and
(5) "Reproductive health care services" means all medical, surgical,
counseling or referral services relating to the human reproductive
system, including, but not limited to, services relating to sexual health,
pregnancy, contraception or the termination of a pregnancy.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b) of this section, if a health care provider is acting in good
faith, within the health care provider's scope of practice, education,
training and experience, including the health care provider's specialty
areas of practice and board certification, and within the accepted
standard of care, a health care entity shall not limit the health care
provider's provision of the following with regard to reproductive health
care services and gender-affirming health care services:
(1) Comprehensive medically accurate and appropriate information
and counseling that conforms to the accepted standard of care to an
individual patient regarding that patient's health status, including, but
not limited to, diagnosis, prognosis, recommended treatment, treatment
alternatives and any potential risks to the patient's health or life; and
(2) Comprehensive medically accurate and appropriate information
and counseling about available and relevant services and resources in
the community and how to access such services and resources to obtain
health care of the patient's choosing.
(b) Nothing in subsection (a) of this section shall be construed to
prohibit a health care entity that employs a health care provider from
(1) performing relevant peer review of the health care provider, (2)
requiring the health care provider to provide the full range of
information to patients about available, legal options for care, as
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5516
determined by the health care entity, including, but not limited to,
vaccinations, or (3) requiring such health care provider to:
(A) Comply with preferred provider network or utilization review
requirements of any program or entity authorized by state or federal
law to provide insurance coverage for health care services to an enrollee,
including, but not limited to, the conditions of participation for hospitals
developed by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services; or
(B) Meet established health care quality and patient safety guidelines
or rules.
(c) A health care entity shall not discharge, demote, suspend,
discipline or take any other adverse action against a health care provider
solely because the health care provider has provided information or
counseling as described in subsection (a) of this section. The provisions
of this subsection shall not apply to a health care provider who fails to
comply with the instruction of a health care entity to provide patients
with the full range of information about available, legal options for care,
as determined by the health care entity, including, but not limited to,
vaccinations.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
PH Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3